New York, session 2025-2026, S8192.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The judiciary law is amended by adding a new section 219-f 2 to read as follows: 3 § 219-f. Sufficiency of number of judges and justices in districts and 4 courts. In exercising its powers pursuant to subdivision b of section 5 six of article six of the constitution, the legislature shall seek to 6 ensure that each district and court therein shall have sufficient 7 numbers of judges and justices to perform its functions in a thorough 8 and efficient manner, considering the number of individuals residing in 9 a given judicial district, the number of cases filed in each court, the 10 complexity of such cases, the extent of delays in the disposition of 11 cases in each court, and any other factors used by recognized national 12 or state authorities who study the proper allocation of judicial 13 resources. 14 § 2. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 1 of section 212 of the judiciary 15 law, as added by chapter 156 of the laws of 1978, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 (j) Collect, compile and publish statistics and other data with 18 respect to the unified court system in order to assist the legislature 19 in performing its functions pursuant to section two hundred nineteen-f 20 of this article and submit annually, on or before the fifteenth day of 21 March, to the legislature and the governor a report of [his] such admin- 22 istrator's activities and the state of the unified court system during 23 the preceding year. Such report shall include recommendations on the 24 number of judges and justices needed in each court, which recommenda- 25 tions shall be acted upon in such manner as the legislature may direct. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 27 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04224-01-5